Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8490.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Access to high-quality maternal and infant health care services is essential to the health
and well-being of families in Newport County and across Rhode Island.
(2) The Newport Hospital birthing center provides critical, community-based maternity
care, reducing the need for patients to travel off-island for services.
(3) The preservation and long-term sustainability of birthing services require coordinated
public, private, and philanthropic investment.
(4) It is in the public interest to establish a dedicated fund to support the continued operation
and improvement of the birthing center.
(5) The birthing center is an owned entity of Lifespan Physician Group, Inc., operating as
Brown University Health, but it is also a community resource and should be treated that way.
Therefore, the purpose of this act is to establish the Noreen Drexel Birthing Center Fund
to provide immediate and sustainable financial support for the operation of the birthing center.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 13.9
THE NOREEN DREXEL BIRTHING CENTER FUND
23-13.9-1. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Noreen Drexel Birthing Center Fund
Act.”
23-13.9-2. Establishment of the fund.
(a) There is hereby established within the department of health a restricted receipt account
to be known as the “Noreen Drexel Birthing Center Fund,” hereinafter referred to as the “fund.”
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department of health in collaboration with the
Newport Hospital Foundation.
(c) Monies in the fund shall be used exclusively to support the continued operation,
staffing, and enhancement of birthing services at Newport Hospital or any successor entity
providing equivalent services in Newport County.
23-13.9-3. Funding.
(a) For fiscal year 2027, the total appropriation from the state to the fund shall be one
million six hundred thirty-three thousand three hundred thirty-three dollars ($1,633,333), which
appropriation shall be conditional upon the following.
(1) A deposit of one million six hundred thirty-three thousand three hundred thirty-three
dollars ($1,633,333), derived from Brown Health or its successor entity is provided to the fund;
and
(2) Deposit(s) totaling one million six hundred thirty-three thousand three hundred thirty-
three dollars ($1,633,333), derived from philanthropic contributions including, but not limited to,
donations from individuals, foundations, and community organizations is provided to the fund.
(b) The Newport Hospital Foundation is authorized to deposit philanthropic contributions
into the fund and under the authorization of the department of health may receive funding to
effectuate the purpose of § 23-13.9-2(c).
23-13.9-4. Conditions and accountability.
(a) Brown Health or its operating entity shall be eligible for funds pursuant to this chapter
provided they maintain:
(1) Birthing services at Newport Hospital for the duration of the funding period;
(2) Continuous, year-round operation of inpatient labor and delivery services at Newport
Hospital, without seasonal, or unreasonable intermittent, or temporary suspension;
(3) Twenty-four (24) hour, seven (7)-day-per-week availability of hospital-based obstetric
services, including on-site or immediately available obstetric physicians;
(4) Certified nurse staffing levels sufficient to support safe and timely deliveries including
emergency obstetric care without diversion, routine transfer, or redirection of patients to other
facilities due to staffing limitations;
LC006365 - Page 2 of 4

(5) No reduction in the scope of services offered at the birthing center including, but not
limited to:
(i) Elimination of inpatient labor and delivery;
(ii) Conversion to outpatient-only, triage-only, or stabilization-only services;
(iii) Routine diversion of laboring patients to other hospitals; or
(iv) Restrictions that effectively require planned deliveries to occur off-island; and
(6) No administrative, financial, or operational action that renders the birthing center
incapable of serving the healthcare needs of women and infants in Newport County.
(b) Brown Health or its operating entity, for eligibility for funding under this chapter shall:
(1) Provide quarterly financial reports detailing revenues, expenses, and use of fund
resources to the director of the department of health and the Newport Hospital Foundation Board;
(2) Provide a final annual report on the use and impact of the fund to the director of the
department of health, the Newport Hospital Foundation Board, the general assembly, and any
philanthropic organizations that supported the fund;
(3) Conduct an annual open meeting for transparency and oversight detailing the status of
the birthing center;
(4) Participate in any community councils created in collaboration with local city and town
councils, state legislators, the Newport Hospital Foundation, and representatives of community-
based organizations; and
(5) Develop and submit, with community input, a sustainability plan for the birthing center
within twelve (12) months of receipt of funds to build a state-of-the-art women’s and maternal
healthcare facility.
(c) The council established pursuant to subsection (b)(4) of this section shall:
(1) Once established, meet at least quarterly to review the findings on outcomes, quality,
safety and financial data of the birthing center, and plan for the future of the Noreen Drexel birthing
center at Newport Hospital; and
(2) Ensure decisions pertaining to the fund are broadly supported, collaborative, and
positions the community both for input and to help with any required fundraising or advocacy to
insure the sustainability of the birthing center.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006365
========
LC006365 - Page 3 of 4